Massachusetts, session 194th, S2737.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Section 1 of Chapter 176k of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 22, the words “other than a person
eligible for Medicare coverage due solely to end-stage renal disease”.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1